Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 9 Consent for Surgical or Medical Treatment

Cross references.

Adult’s reliance on prayer or religious nonmedical means of treatment of dependent, §

15-11-107

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Professional services, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Healthcare Facility Regulation, § 111-8-4-.09.

Informed consent, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Composite Medical Board, Chapter 360-14.

Law reviews.

For article, “Informed Consent: New Georgia Guidelines,” discussing law of medical consent in Georgia, in light of Young v. Yarn,

136 Ga. App. 737

,

222 S.E.2d 113

(1975), see 12 Ga. St. B. J. 197 (1976).

For article, “Res Ipsa Loquitur and Medical Malpractice in Georgia: A Reassessment,” see 17 Ga. L. Rev. 33 (1982).

For article, “Baby Doe Cases: Compromise and Moral Dilemma,” see 34 Emory L.J. 545 (1986).

For note, “The Evolution of the Doctrine of Informed Consent,” see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 581 (1978).

31-9-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Medical Consent Law.”

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2901, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 438, § 1.

31-9-2.
Persons authorized to consent to surgical or medical treatment.

In addition to such other persons as may be authorized and empowered, any one of the following persons is authorized and empowered to consent, either orally or otherwise, to any surgical or medical treatment or procedures not prohibited by law which may be suggested, recommended, prescribed, or directed by a duly licensed physician:

Any adult, for himself or herself, whether by living will, advance directive for health care, psychiatric advance directive under Chapter 11 of Title 37, or otherwise;

(1.1)

Any person authorized to give such consent for the adult under an advance directive for health care or durable power of attorney for health care under Chapter 32 of this title or psychiatric advance directive under Chapter 11 of Title 37;

In the absence or unavailability of a person authorized pursuant to paragraph (1.1) of this subsection, any married person for his or her spouse;

In the absence or unavailability of a living spouse, any parent, whether an adult or a minor, for his or her minor child;

Any person temporarily standing in loco parentis, whether formally serving or not, for the minor under his or her care; and any guardian, for his or her ward;

Any female, regardless of age or marital status, for herself when given in connection with pregnancy, or the prevention thereof, or childbirth;

Upon the inability of any adult to consent for himself or herself and in the absence of any person to consent under paragraphs (1.1) through (5) of this subsection, the following persons in the following order of priority:

Any adult child for his or her parents;

Any parent for his or her adult child;

Any adult for his or her brother or sister;

Any grandparent for his or her grandchild;

Any adult grandchild for his or her grandparent; or

Any adult niece, nephew, aunt, or uncle of the patient who is related to the patient in the first degree; or

Upon the inability of any adult to consent for himself or herself and in the absence of any person to consent under paragraphs (1.1) through (6) of this subsection, an adult friend of the patient. For purposes of this paragraph, “adult friend” means an adult who has exhibited special care and concern for the patient, who is generally familiar with the patient’s health care views and desires, and who is willing and able to become involved in the patient’s health care decisions and to act in the patient’s best interest. The adult friend shall sign and date an acknowledgment form provided by the hospital or other health care facility in which the patient is located for placement in the patient’s records certifying that he or she meets such criteria.

(a.1)

In the absence, after reasonable inquiry, of any person authorized in subsection (a) of this Code section to consent for the patient, a hospital or other health care facility or any interested person may initiate proceedings for expedited judicial intervention to appoint a temporary medical consent guardian pursuant to Code Section 29-4-18.

Any person authorized and empowered to consent under subsection (a) of this Code section shall, after being informed of the provisions of this Code section, act in good faith to consent to surgical or medical treatment or procedures which the patient would have wanted had the patient understood the circumstances under which such treatment or procedures are provided. The person who consents on behalf of the patient in accordance with subsection (a) of this Code section shall have the right to visit the patient in accordance with the hospital or health care facility’s visitation policy.

For purposes of this Code section, the term “inability of any adult to consent for himself or herself” means a determination in the medical record by a licensed physician after the physician has personally examined the adult that the adult “lacks sufficient understanding or capacity to make significant responsible decisions” regarding his or her medical treatment or the ability to communicate by any means such decisions.

No hospital or other health care facility, health care provider, or other person or entity shall be subject to civil or criminal liability or discipline for unprofessional conduct solely for relying in good faith on any direction or decision by any person reasonably believed to be authorized and empowered to consent under subsection (a) of this Code section even if death or injury to the patient ensues. Each hospital or other health care facility, health care provider, and any other person or entity who acts in good faith reliance on any such direction or decision shall be protected and released to the same extent as though such person had interacted directly with the patient as a fully competent person.

No person authorized and empowered to consent under subsection (a) of this Code section who, in good faith, acts with due care for the benefit of the patient, or who fails to act, shall be subject to civil or criminal liability for such action or inaction.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2904, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 438, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 688, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 704, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 335, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 31; Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 12/HB 24; Ga. L. 2010, p. 852, § 1/SB 367; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-10/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, inserted “psychiatric advance directive under Chapter 11 of Title 37,” in paragraph (a)(1), and added “or psychiatric advance directive under Chapter 11 of Title 37” at the end of paragraph (a)(1.1).

Cross references.

Temporary medical consent guardianship, §

29-4-18

.

Right of minor to obtain medical services for treatment of venereal disease on minor’s consent alone, §

31-17-7

.

Effect of consent by husband and wife to performance of artificial insemination procedure, §

43-34-37

.

Consent of parent or guardian to blood donation by person 17 years of age or over, §

44-5-89

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 1/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly has long recognized the right of the individual to control all aspects of his or her personal care and medical treatment, including the right to insist upon medical treatment, decline medical treatment, or direct that medical treatment be withdrawn.
In order to secure these rights, the General Assembly has adopted and amended statutes recognizing the living will and health care agency and provided statutory forms for both documents.

“(b) The General Assembly has determined that the statutory forms for the living will and durable power of attorney for health care are confusing and inconsistent and that the statutes providing for the living will and health care agency contain conflicting concepts, inconsistent and out-of-date terminology, and confusing and inconsistent requirements for execution. In addition, there is a commendable trend among the states to combine the concepts of the living will and health care agency into a single legal document.

“(c) The General Assembly recognizes that a significant number of individuals representing the academic, medical, legislative, and legal communities, state officials, ethics scholars, and advocacy groups worked together to develop the advance directive for health care contained in this Act, and the collective intent was to create a form that uses understandable and everyday language in order to encourage more citizens of this state to execute advance directives for health care.

“(d) The General Assembly finds that the clear expression of an individual’s decisions regarding health care, whether made by the individual or an agent appointed by the individual, is of critical importance not only to citizens but also to the health care and legal communities, third parties, and families. In furtherance of these purposes, the General Assembly enacts a new Chapter 32 of Title 31, setting forth general principles governing the expression of decisions regarding health care and the appointment of a health care agent, as well as a form of advance directive for health care.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Marriage, Death and Taxes:
The Estate Planning Impact of Windsor and Obergefell on Georgia’s Same Sex Spouses,” see 21 Ga. St. B. J. 9 (Oct. 2015).

31-9-3.
Emergencies.

As used in this Code section, the term “emergency” means a situation wherein (1) according to competent medical judgment, the proposed surgical or medical treatment or procedures are reasonably necessary and (2) a person authorized to consent under Code Section 31-9-2 is not readily available and any delay in treatment could reasonably be expected to jeopardize the life or health of the person affected or could reasonably result in disfigurement or impaired faculties.

In addition to any instances in which a consent is excused or implied at law, a consent to surgical or medical treatment or procedures suggested, recommended, prescribed, or directed by a duly licensed physician will be implied where an emergency exists.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2905, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 438, § 1.

Cross references.

Further provisions regarding liability for rendering of emergency care, §§

31-11-8

,

51-1-29

.

31-9-4.
Applicability of chapter to care and treatment of mentally ill.

This chapter shall be applicable to the care and treatment of patients in facilities for the mentally ill as defined in paragraph (7) of Code Section 37-3-1.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2903, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 438, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 704, § 1.

31-9-5.
Applicability of chapter to abortion and sterilization procedures.

This chapter shall not apply in any manner whatsoever to abortion and sterilization procedures, which procedures shall continue to be governed by existing law independently of the terms and provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2902, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 438, § 1.

Cross references.

Abortion generally, §

16-12-140

et seq.

Performance of sterilization procedure, T. 31, C. 20.

31-9-6.
Construction of chapter; requirements of valid consent.

This chapter shall be liberally construed, and all relationships set forth in this chapter shall include the adoptive, foster, and step relations as well as blood relations and the relationship by common-law marriage as well as ceremonial marriage.

A consent by one person authorized and empowered to consent to surgical or medical treatment shall be sufficient.

Any person acting in good faith shall be justified in relying on the representations of any person purporting to give consent, including, but not limited to, his identity, his age, his marital status, his emancipation, and his relationship to any other person for whom the consent is purportedly given.

A consent to surgical or medical treatment which discloses in general terms the treatment or course of treatment in connection with which it is given and which is duly evidenced in writing and signed by the patient or other person or persons authorized to consent pursuant to the terms of this chapter shall be conclusively presumed to be a valid consent in the absence of fraudulent misrepresentations of material facts in obtaining the same.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2906, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 438, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31.

Law reviews.

For article, “Informed Consent: New Georgia Guidelines,” discussing law of medical consent in Georgia, in light of Young v. Yarn,

136 Ga. App. 737

,

222 S.E.2d 113

(1975), see 12 Ga. St. B. J. 197 (1976).

For comment on Young v. Yarn,

136 Ga. App. 737

,

222 S.E.2d 113

(1975), see 28 Mercer L. Rev. 377 (1976).

For article, “Georgia’s Medical Consent Law,” see 21 Ga. St. B. J. 138 (1985).

For note, “Informed Confusion: The Doctrine of Informed Consent in Georgia,” see 37 Ga. L. Rev. 1129 (2003).

For article, “Doreika v. Blotner: Affirming Ketchup against Judicial Mustard,”
see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 807 (2009).

31-9-6.1.
Disclosure of certain information to persons undergoing certain surgical or diagnostic procedures; failure to comply; exceptions; regulations establishing standards for implementation.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, any person who undergoes any surgical procedure under general anesthesia, spinal anesthesia, or major regional anesthesia or any person who undergoes an amniocentesis diagnostic procedure or a diagnostic procedure which involves the intravenous or intraductal injection of a contrast material must consent to such procedure and shall be informed in general terms of the following:

A diagnosis of the patient’s condition requiring such proposed surgical or diagnostic procedure;

The nature and purpose of such proposed surgical or diagnostic procedure;

The material risks generally recognized and accepted by reasonably prudent physicians of infection, allergic reaction, severe loss of blood, loss or loss of function of any limb or organ, paralysis or partial paralysis, paraplegia or quadriplegia, disfiguring scar, brain damage, cardiac arrest, or death involved in such proposed surgical or diagnostic procedure which, if disclosed to a reasonably prudent person in the patient’s position, could reasonably be expected to cause such prudent person to decline such proposed surgical or diagnostic procedure on the basis of the material risk of injury that could result from such proposed surgical or diagnostic procedure;

The likelihood of success of such proposed surgical or diagnostic procedure;

The practical alternatives to such proposed surgical or diagnostic procedure which are generally recognized and accepted by reasonably prudent physicians; and

The prognosis of the patient’s condition if such proposed surgical or diagnostic procedure is rejected.

If a consent to a surgical or diagnostic procedure is required to be obtained under this Code section and such consent is not obtained in writing in accordance with the requirements of this Code section, then no presumption shall arise as to the validity of such consent.

If a consent to a diagnostic or surgical procedure is required to be obtained under this Code section and such consent discloses in general terms the information required in subsection (a) of this Code section, is duly evidenced in writing, and is signed by the patient or other person or persons authorized to consent pursuant to the terms of this chapter, then such consent shall be rebuttably presumed to be a valid consent.

In situations where a consent to a surgical or diagnostic procedure is required under this Code section, it shall be the responsibility of the responsible physician to ensure that the information required by subsection (a) of this Code section is disclosed and that the consent provided for in this Code section is obtained. The information provided for in this Code section may be disclosed through the use of video tapes, audio tapes, pamphlets, booklets, or other means of communication or through conversations with nurses, physician assistants, trained counselors, patient educators, or other similar persons known by the responsible physician to be knowledgeable and capable of communicating such information; provided, however, that for the purposes of this Code section only, if any employee of a hospital or ambulatory surgical treatment center participates in any such conversations at the request of the responsible physician, such employee shall be considered for such purposes to be solely the agent of the responsible physician.

A failure to comply with the requirements of this Code section shall not constitute a separate cause of action but may give rise to an action for medical malpractice as defined in Code Section 9-3-70 and as governed by other provisions of this Code relating to such actions; and any such action shall be brought against the responsible physician or any hospital, ambulatory surgical treatment center, professional corporation, or partnership of which the responsible physician is an employee or partner and which is responsible for such physician’s acts, or both, upon a showing:

That the patient suffered an injury which was proximately caused by the surgical or diagnostic procedure;

That information concerning the injury suffered was not disclosed as required by this Code section; and

That a reasonably prudent patient would have refused the surgical or diagnostic procedure or would have chosen a practical alternative to such proposed surgical or diagnostic procedure if such information had been disclosed;

provided, however, that, as to an allegation of negligence for failure to comply with the requirements of this Code section, the expert’s affidavit required by Code Section 9-11-9.1 shall set forth that the patient suffered an injury which was proximately caused by the surgical or diagnostic procedure and that such injury was a material risk required to be disclosed under this Code section.

The disclosure of information and the consent provided for in this Code section shall not be required if:

An emergency exists as defined in Code Section 31-9-3;

The surgical or diagnostic procedure is generally recognized by reasonably prudent physicians to be a procedure which does not involve a material risk to the patient involved;

A patient or other person or persons authorized to give consent pursuant to this chapter make a request in writing that the information provided for in this Code section not be disclosed;

A prior consent, within 30 days of the surgical or diagnostic procedure, complying with the requirements of this Code section to the surgical or diagnostic procedure has been obtained as a part of a course of treatment for the patient’s condition; provided, however, that if such consent is obtained in conjunction with the admission of the patient to a hospital for the performance of such procedure, the consent shall be valid for a period of 30 days from the date of admission or for the period of time the person is confined in the hospital for that purpose, whichever is greater; or

The surgical or diagnostic procedure was unforeseen or was not known to be needed at the time consent was obtained, and the patient has consented to allow the responsible physician to make the decision concerning such procedure.

A prior consent to surgical or diagnostic procedures obtained pursuant to the provisions of this Code section shall be deemed to be valid consent for the responsible physician and all medical personnel under the direct supervision and control of the responsible physician in the performance of such surgical or diagnostic procedure and for all other medical personnel otherwise involved in the course of treatment of the patient’s condition.

The Georgia Composite Medical Board shall be required to adopt and have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations governing and establishing the standards necessary to implement this chapter specifically including but not limited to the disciplining of a physician who fails to comply with this Code section.

As used in this Code section, the term “responsible physician” means the physician who performs the procedure or the physician under whose direct orders the procedure is performed by a nonphysician.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-9-6.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1443, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 178, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1400, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 31; Ga. L. 2009, p. 859, §§ 2, 3/HB 509.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section
28-9-5, in 1988, a comma was inserted following “spinal anesthesia” in the introductory paragraph of subsection (a).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, “that” was deleted following “showing” at the end of the introductory language in subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1988, p. 1443, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 1989, and shall apply to all such surgical or diagnostic procedures performed on or after January 1, 1989.”

Law reviews.

For annual survey on law of torts, see 42 Mercer L. Rev. 431 (1990).

For article, “Albany Urology Clinic, P.C. v. Cleveland: Why You Should Always Ask Your Urologist if He Is a Cocaine Addict,” see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 1159 (2001).

For note, “Informed Confusion: The Doctrine of Informed Consent in Georgia,” see 37 Ga. L. Rev. 1129 (2003).

For article, “Doreika v. Blotner: Affirming Ketchup against Judicial Mustard,”
see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 807 (2009).

For article, “Eleventh Circuit Survey: January 1, 2008 — December 31, 2008: Casenote: Shots, Shoes, and Self-Representation: Indiana v. Edwards and the New Limitation on the Sixth Amendment Right of Self-Representation,”
see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 1509 (2009).

For annual survey of law on appellate practice and procedure, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 25 (2010).

For annual survey of law on trial practice and procedure, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 339 (2010).

For annual survey on trial practice and procedure, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 305 (2012).

For note, “An Advance Directive: The Elective, Effective Way to be Protective of Your Rights,” see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 521 (2017).

31-9-7.
Right of persons who are at least 18 years of age to refuse to consent to treatment.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to abridge any right of a person 18 years of age or over to refuse to consent to medical and surgical treatment as to his own person.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2907, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 438, § 1.